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DTC P0133 Oxygen Sensor Circuit Slow Response
(Bank 1 Sensor 1)

DTC P0153 Oxygen Sensor Circuit Slow Response
(Bank 2 Sensor 1)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
Refer to DTC P0031 on page DI−35.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

P0133
P0153

VoltageofHeatedOxygenSensor (HO2S)sensor 1 doesnot
switch between Lean and Rich for 0.9 seconds
(2 trip detection logic)
Lean: 0.4 V or less
Rich: 0.55 V or more

SOpenorshort in frontheatedoxygensensorcircuit
SFrontheatedoxygensensor

SFrontheatedoxygensensorheater
SEFIorECDrelay
SAir inductionsystem
SFuelpressure
S Injector
SEnginecontrolECU

HINT:
S Bank 1 refers tobank that includescylinderNo. 1.
S Bank2refers tobank thatdoesnot includescylinderNo. 1.
S Sensor 1 refers to thesensorcloser to theengineassembly.

DIC27−02
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MONITOR DESCRIPTION

TheenginecontrolECUuses theheatedoxygensensor information to regulate theair −fuel ratioclose to
a stoichiometric ratio. This maximizes the catalytic converter’s ability to purify the exhaust gases. The sensor
detects oxygen levels in the exhaust gas and sends this signal to the engine control ECU.
The inner surface of the sensor element is exposed to outside air. The outer surface of the sensor element
is exposed to exhaust gas. The sensor element is made of platinum coated zirconia and includes an inte-
grated heating element. The heated oxygen sensor has the characteristic whereby its output voltage
changessuddenly in thevicinityof thestoichiometricair −fuel ratio.Theheatedoxygensensorgenerates
waveformsofavoltagebetween0Vand 1 V in response to theoxygenconcentration inexhaustgas.When
the output voltage of the heated oxygen sensor is 0.55 V or more, the engine control ECU judges that the
air−fuel ratio isRICH.When it is0.40Vor less, theenginecontrolECUjudges that theair −

fuel ratio isLEAN.
TheenginecontrolECUmonitors the response featureof theheatedoxygensensor. If the response time
of theheatedoxygensensoroutputstatuschange fromRICHtoLEANorviceversabecomes longer, the
engine control ECU interprets this as a malfunction in the heated oxygen sensor and sets a DTC.
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WIRING DIAGRAM
Refer to DTC P0031 on page DI−35.

CONFIRMATION DRIVING PATTERN

(a) Connect the hand−held tester to the DLC3.
(b) Switch from normal mode to check mode (see page DI−3) .
(c)Allow theengine to idleuntil theEngineCoolantTemperature (ECT) reaches75 �C (167�F).
(d) Allow the vehicle to run at 40 km/h (25 mph) or more for 25 seconds or more.
(e) Allow the engine to idle for 30 seconds or more. Perform steps (d) and (e) at least 3 times.
(f) Allow the engine to idle for 30 seconds.
HINT:
If amalfunctionexists, thecheckenginewarning lightwill be illuminatedon themulti −informationdisplay
during step (f).
NOTICE:
If the conditions in this test are not strictly followed, you should perform steps (d) and (e).
If you do not have the Intelligent Tester II, turn the ignition switch OFF after performing steps from
(c) to (f), then perform steps from (c) to (f) again.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
Hand−held testeronly:
The narrowing down the trouble area is possible by performing ACTIVE TEST of the following ”A/F CON-
TROL” (Heated oxygen sensor or another can be distinguished).
(a)PerformACTIVETESTbyhand −held tester (A/FCONTROL).
HINT:
”A/FCONTROL” is theACTIVETESTwhichchanges the injectionvolumeto −12.5%or+25%.

(1)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3on thevehicle.
(2) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(3) Warm up the engine with the engine speed at 2,500 rpm for approximately 90 seconds.
(4) Select the item ”DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / ACTIVE TEST / A/F CONTROL”.
(5) Perform ”A/F CONTROL” with the engine in an idle condition (press the right or left button).

RESULT:
Heated oxygen sensor reacts in accordance with increase and decrease of injection volume
+25% � richoutput:More than0.5V
−12.5% � leanoutput:Lessthan0.4V



+25 %

−12.5%

More than 0.55 V
Less than 0.4 V

Case 1

Case2

Case3

Case4

Outputvoltageofheatedoxygen
sensor (sensor 1: frontsensor)

Injection volume

Outputvoltage

Outputvoltageofheatedoxygen
sensor (sensor2: rearsensor)

Mainly suspect
trouble area

OK

+25 %

−12.5%

More than 0.55 V

Less than 0.4 V

Injection volume

Outputvoltage

+25 %

−12.5%

More than 0.5 V
Less than0.4V

Injection volume

Output voltage

Sensor 1: frontsensor
(sensor 1,heater, sensor 1
circuit)

+25 %

−12.5%

More than 0.5 V

Less than 0.4 V

Injection volume

Output voltage

+25 %

−12.5%

Injection volume

Outputvoltage

NG

+25 %

−12.5%

Injection volume

Output voltage

NG

+25 %

−12.5%

Injection volume

Outputvoltage

NG

+25 %

−12.5%

Injection volume

Output voltage

NG

Extremely rich or lean of the
actualair −fuel ratio
(Injector, fuel pressure, gas
leakage in exhaust system,
etc.)

OK

OK

OK

Almost no reaction

�

Sensor 2: rear sensor
(sensor 2, heater, sensor 2
circuit)

Almost no reaction

Almostno reaction

Almostno reaction
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NOTICE:
However, there isa fewseconddelay in thesensor 1 (frontsensor)output.Andthere isamaximum
20 seconds delay in the sensor 2 (rear sensor).

The following A/F CONTROL procedure enables the technician to check and graph the voltage output of
theheatedoxygensensors (sensor 1 and2).
For displaying the graph indication, enter ”ACTIVE TEST / A/F CONTROL / USER DATA” then select ”O2S
B1S1 andO2SB 1S2”bypressing ”YES”buttonandpush”ENTER”buttonbeforepressing ”F4”button.
NOTICE:
If thevehicle isshortof fuel, theair −fuel ratiobecomesLEANandDTCsP0 133and/orP0 153willbe
recorded, and the MIL then comes on.
S Read freeze framedatausing thehand −held tester.Freeze framedata records theengineconditions

when a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, it is useful for determining whether the vehicle
was runningorstopped, theenginewaswarmedupornot, theair −fuel ratiowas leanor rich,etc.at
the time of the malfunction.

S Ahighheatedoxygensensor (sensor 1)voltage (0.55Vormore)couldbecausedbyarichair fuel
mixture. Check for conditions that would cause the engine to run rich.

S Alowheatedoxygensensor (sensor 1)voltage (0.4Vor less)couldbecausedbya leanair fuelmix-
ture. Check for conditions that would cause the engine to run lean.
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1 Are there any other codes (besides DTC P0133 or P0153) being output?

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the hand−held tester to the DLC3.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON and push the hand−held tester main switch ON.
(c) When using hand−held tester, enter the following menus: DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DTC INFO /

CURRENT CODES.
CHECK:
Read the DTC using the hand−held tester.
RESULT:

Display (DTC Output) Proceed to

”P0133 and/or P0153” A

”P0133 or P0153” and other DTCs B

HINT:
If any other codes besides ”P0133 and/or P0153” are output, perform the troubleshooting for those DTCs
first.

B Go to relevant DTC chart (See page DI−1 9) .

A
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2 Check output voltage of heated oxygen sensor during idling.

PREPARATION:
(a) Warm up the heated oxygen sensor with the engine speed at 2,500 rpm for approximately 90 seconds.
(b) Connect the hand−held tester to the DLC3.
(c) When using hand−held tester, enter the following menu: DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DATA LIST / ALL

/ O2S B1 S1 or B2 S1.
CHECK:
Check the output voltage of the heated oxygen sensor while idling the hand−held tester.
OK:

Heated oxygen sensor output voltage:
Alternates between less than 0.40 V and more than 0.55 V, and period of ”t” must exist less than
0.9 seconds (See the following table).

OK Go to step 9.

NG
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A21543
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EFI or ECD Relay
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3 Check resistance of heated oxygen sensor heater.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the H11, H12, H13 or H14 heated oxygen sensor
connector.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals of the heated oxygen
sensor.
OK:

Tester Connection Specified Condition

HT (H11−1) − +B (H11−2) 11.7 to 14.3 � (20˚C)

HT (H12−1) − +B (H12−2) 11.7 to 14.3 � (20˚C)

HT (H13−1) − +B (H13−2) 11.7 to 14.3 � (20˚C)

HT (H14−1) − +B (H14−2) 11.7 to 14.3 � (20˚C)

NG Replace heated oxygen sensor.

OK

4 Check EFI or ECD relay.

PREPARATION:
Remove the EFI or ECD relay from the engine room R/B.
CHECK:
Inspect the EFI or ECD relay.
OK:

Terminal No. Condition Specified Condition

Usually 10 k� or higher

1 − 3 Apply B+ between
terminals 2 and 4

Below 1 �

NG Replace EFI or ECD relay.

OK
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A19522 A19630Engine Control ECU Connector

HT1B
HT1A OX1A

OX2A

HT2B
HT2A OX1B

E8
OX2B
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5 Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine control ECU
and heated oxygen sensor.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the H11, H12, H13 or H14 heated oxygen

sensor connector.
(b) Disconnect the E8 engine control ECU connector.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the wire harness side connec-
tors.
OK:

Tester Connection Specified Condition

OX (H11−3) − OX1A (E8−23) Below 1 �

HT (H11−1) − HT1A (E8−4) Below 1 �

OX (H12−3) − OX1B (E8−29) Below 1 �

HT (H12−1) − HT1B (E8−5) Below 1 �

OX (H13−3) − OX2A (E8−22) Below 1 �

HT (H13−1) − HT2A (E8−33) Below 1 �

OX (H14−3) − OX2B (E8−21) Below 1 �

HT (H14−1) − HT2B (E8−25) Below 1 �

OX (H11−3) or OX1A (E8−23) −
Body ground

10 k� or higher

HT (H11−1) or HT1A (E8−4) −
Body ground

10 k� or higher

OX (H12−3) or OX1B (E8−29) −
Body ground

10 k� or higher

HT (H12−1) or HT1B (E8−5) −
Body ground

10 k� or higher

OX (H13−3) or OX2A (E8−22) −
Body ground

10 k� or higher

HT (H13−1) or HT2A (E8−33) −
Body ground

10 k� or higher

OX (H14−3) or OX2B (E8−21) −
Body ground

10 k� or higher

HT (H14−1) or HT2B (E8−25) −
Body ground

10 k� or higher
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Reference (Bank 1 Sensor 1 System Drawing)

From
Battery EFI or ECD

No. 1 Fuse

EFI or ECD
Relay EFI or ECD

No. 2 Fuse

Heater Oxygen
Sensor

Heater

Sensor

HT1A

OX1A

E2

MREL

Engine Control ECU
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NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

6 Check air induction system (See Pub. No. RM630E, page FI−1).

CHECK:
Check the air induction system for vacuum leaks.

NG Repair or replace air induction system.

OK

7 Check fuel pressure (See Pub. No. RM630E, page FI−1).

CHECK:
Check the fuel pressure (high or low pressure).

NG Check and repair fuel pump, pressure regulator,
fuel pipe line and filter (See Pub. No. RM630E,
page FI−7).

OK
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8 Check injector injection (See Pub. No. RM630E, page FI−24).

NG Replace injector.

OK

Replace heated oxygen sensor.

9 Perform confirmation driving pattern.

HINT:
Clear all DTCs prior to performing the confirmation driving pattern.

Go

10 Is there DTC P0133 or P0153 being output again?

NO Check for intermittent problems
(See page DI−3) .

YES

Replace heated oxygen sensor.


